Connecticut, session 2026, SB00265.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
sections 3 and 4 of special act 26-1, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall transfer
seventy million dollars from the Federal Cuts Response Fund,
established pursuant to section 1 of special act 26-1, to the Office of Early
Childhood. The Commissioner of Early Childhood shall expend such
seventy million dollars as follows:
(1) Sixty-five million dollars to (A) supplement the appropriation for
the child care subsidy program, established pursuant to section 17b-749
of the general statutes, for the purpose of covering children who are
currently on the waiting list described in subdivision (10) of subsection
(c) of section 17b-749 of the general statutes, with priority given to those
children on such waiting list who (i) are from families with other
children who are currently covered under the child care subsidy
program, and (ii) have special needs, and (B) if there are any
LCO 1317 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 265
unexpended funds after fulfilling the requirement in subparagraph (A)
of this subdivision, be used for provider stabilization, workforce
recruitment and retention, expanded access to subsidized child care,
increased program capacity and quality improvement efforts; and
(2) Five million dollars to be disbursed, at the commissioner's
discretion, as a bonus to licensed child care providers located in eastern
Connecticut that participate in the child care subsidy program, or any
other subsidized program for low-income families, for the purpose of
addressing regional disparities in provider capacity, workforce
shortages and access to child care services, as described in section 19a-
77 of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
KID Joint Favorable C/R APP
LCO 1317 2 of 2